Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2783.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-1308, to read: START_STATUTE23-1308. Labor organization; recertification; annual basis; requirement; definition a. A labor organization that is organized in this state shall recertify its status as a labor organization on an annual basis. b. For the purposes of this section, "recertify" means the process where employees in an established bargaining agreement participate in a formal vote to reaffirm whether the employees desire for their current labor organization to act as their exclusive bargaining representative. END_STATUTE